src/verb-sms-morph.txt
!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Verbs !!
!!!!!!!!!!!

! Even-syllable stems
! -------------------

! The verb _viǯǯâd_ arrive in form _viǯǯ_
LEXICON VIQQAD
+V+Inf:%>âd FINAL1 ;
+V+Ind+Prs: VIQQAD-Prs ;
+V+Ind+Prt: VIQQAD-Prt ;
+V+Imp: VIQQAD-Imp ;
+V:%^VOWL%^CShort%> VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>âž	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+ActEss:%>men FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%^VOWL%^CShort%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%^VOWL%^CShort%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>âm FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>i FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>âm FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%^VOWSH%^CLong%>um FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kâni FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kani FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ǩeânai FINAL1 ;		!WG



! The verb _teevvad_ arrive in form _teevv_
LEXICON TEEVVAD
+V+Ind+Prs:		TEEVVAD-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		TEEVVAD-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			TEEVVAD-IMP ;
+V:%^VOWL%^CShort%> VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%>ad FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>ai FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>men FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWRaise%>um FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%^VOWL%^CShort%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%^VOWL%^CShort%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kâni FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kani FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ǩeânai FINAL1 ;		!WG

! The verb _kâˊlmmed_ arrives in form _kâlmm_
! raising in +Ind+Prt+Pl3, Pot
! lengthening in 
LEXICON KALMMED
+V+Ind+Prs:		KALMMED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		KALMMED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			KALMMED-IMP ;
+V:%^VOWL%^CShort%>		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWRaise%^PAL%>ež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%^VOWFront%^PAL%>ed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>men FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%^VOWL%^CShort%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%^VOWL%^CShort%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>em FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^PAL%>i FINAL1 ;
!+V+PrfPrc:%>ääm FINAL1 ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu FINAL1 ;
!+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>ukku FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kâni FINAL1 ;			!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kani FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ǩeânai FINAL1 ;		!WG

! The verb _kâˊlmmed_ arrives in form _kâlmm_
! raising in +Ind+Prt+Pl3, Pot
! lengthening in
LEXICON JURDDED
+V+Ind+Prs:             JURDDED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:             JURDDED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:                 JURDDED-IMP ;
+V:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL       POTENTIAL ; !
+V:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower    CONDITIONAL ; !
+V+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWRaise%^PAL%>ež    FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%^VOWFront%^PAL%>ed FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>em FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%^PAL%>men FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%^PAL%>em FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^PAL%>i FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^VOWLower%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um FINAL1 ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>u FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>kâni FINAL1 ;                 !WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>kani FINAL1 ;         !WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>ǩeânai FINAL1 ;               !WG


! The verb _tieˊtted_ arrives in form _tiõtt_
LEXICON TIETTED
+V+Ind+Prs:		TIETTED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		TIETTED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			TIETTED-IMP ;
+V:%^VOWL%^CShort%>	VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%^VOWFront%^PAL%>ed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>men FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%^VOWL%^CShort%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%^VOWL%^CShort%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>em FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^PAL%>i FINAL1 ;
!+V+PrfPrc:%>ääm FINAL1 ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu FINAL1 ;
!+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>ukku FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kâni FINAL1 ;			!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>kani FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ǩeânai FINAL1 ;		!WG

! Odd-syllable stems
! ------------------
! Contracted stems
! ----------------

LEXICON SILTTEED
+V+Ind+Prs:		TEEMEED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		TEEMEED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			TEEMEED-IMP ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:%>âd		FINAL1 ;
+V:%>eˊ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>eež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%>eed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>eˊmen FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>eem FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>eei FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>ääm FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>uum FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%>eǩâni FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>ukku FINAL1 ;

LEXICON SOLLEED
+V+Ind+Prs:		TEEMEED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		TEEMEED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			TEEMEED-IMP ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:%>ad		FINAL1 ;
+V:%>eˊ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>eež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%>eed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>eˊmen FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>eem FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>eei FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>ääm FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>uum FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%>eǩâni FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>ukku FINAL1 ;

LEXICON TEEMEED
+V+Ind+Prs:		TEEMEED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		TEEMEED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			TEEMEED-IMP ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:%>ed		FINAL1 ;
+V:%>eˊ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>eež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%>eed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>eˊmen FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>eem FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>eei FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>ääm FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>uum FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%>eǩâni FINAL1 ;		!WG
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>ukku FINAL1 ;

! vuejted
LEXICON VUEJTED
 KAMRDED ; ! The distinction is taken care of in twol and stem formulation

! mainsted
LEXICON MAINSTED
+V+Ind+Prs:		MAINSTED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		MAINSTED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			MAINSTED-IMP ;
+V+Ind+Prs:%^VOWL	MAINSTED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:%^VOWL	MAINSTED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:%^VOWL		MAINSTED-IMP ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:%^IMPSG2	FINAL1 ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>uku FINAL1 ;
+V:%>eˊ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>ež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%>ed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>eˊmen FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>eei FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>uum FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%>eǩâni FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%^VOWL%>uku FINAL1 ;
+V:%^VOWL%>eˊ	VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWL%>eˊž	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%^VOWL%>ed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%^VOWL%>eˊmen FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%^VOWL%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^VOWL%>eei FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^VOWL%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%^VOWL%>ummu FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%^VOWL%>uum FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%^VOWL%>eǩâni FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%^VOWL%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%^VOWL%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;

! kåˊmrded
LEXICON KAMRDED
 KAMRDED-01 ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:%^IMPSG2	FINAL1 ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg+Sg2:%>uku FINAL1 ;

LEXICON KAMRDED-01

+V+Ind+Prs:		KAMRDED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		KAMRDED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			KAMRDED-IMP ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>uku FINAL1 ;
+V:%>eˊ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>ež	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Inf:%>ed FINAL1 ;
+V+ActEss:%>eˊmen FINAL1 ;
+V+Action:%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>eei FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>am FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>âmma FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu FINAL1 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%>eǩâni FINAL1 ;
+V+VAbess:%>eǩeânai FINAL1 ;
+V+GerTemp:%>een FINAL1 ;
+V+GerInstr:%>eeˊl FINAL1 ;

! sedggjed 
LEXICON SEDGGJED
:QA1i KAMRDED-01 ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:%^VOWRaise%>u	FINAL1 ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg+Sg2:%^VOWRaise%>u FINAL1 ;

! võˊll’jed
LEXICON VOLLJED
:QA1’i KAMRDED-01 ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:%>e        FINAL1 ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg+Sg2:%>e FINAL1 ;


! leeˊd
LEXICON LEED
+V+Ind+Prs:		LEED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		LEED-PRT ;
+V+Imp:			LEED-IMP ;
+V+Imp+Sg2:eäk'ku	FINAL1 ;
+V+Imp+ConNeg:%>eäk'ku FINAL1 ;
+V:%>eˊč		CONDITIONAL ; !
+V+Pot+Sg1:%>eˊžžem FINAL1	;
+V+Pot+Sg2:%>eˊžžiǩ FINAL1	;
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>eežž	FINAL1 ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>eež	FINAL1 ; !
+V+Pot+Pl1:%>eˊžžep FINAL1	; !
+V+Pot+Pl1:%>eˊžžim FINAL1	; !
+V+Pot+Pl1:%>eˊžžin FINAL1	; !Does this exist
+V+Pot+Pl2:%>eˊžžveˊted FINAL1	;
+V+Pot+Pl3:%>eˊžže FINAL1	;
+V+Pot+4:%>eˊžžet FINAL1 ;
+V+Pot+ConNeg:%>eˊžže FINAL1 ;
+V+Inf:%>eeˊd FINAL1 ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>eˊddi FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>eäm'maž FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>eäm'ma FINAL1 ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>eäm FINAL1 ;



! Intermediate suffix lexica
! --------------------------


! Final suffix lexica
! -------------------

! Suffix series I
! - - - - - - - -

! assuming stem _viǯǯ_
LEXICON VIQQAD-Prs
+Sg1:%^VOWL%^CShort%>am FINAL1 ; ! _viǯǯam_
+Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ak FINAL1 ; ! _viǯǯak_
!+Sg3:^P3 FINAL1 ; ! _veǯǯ_
+Sg3:%^VOWLower FINAL1 ; ! _veǯǯ_
+Pl1:%>âp FINAL1 ; ! _viǯǯâp_
+Pl2:%>veˊted FINAL1 ; ! _viǯǯveˊted_
+Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%^VOWFront%^PAL%>e FINAL1 ; ! _veˊǯǯe_
+4:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ât FINAL1 ;
+ConNeg:%^VOWL%^CShort FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VIQQAD-Prt
+Sg1:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^PAL%>em FINAL1 ; ! _kaˊǧǧem_
+Sg2:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^PAL%>iǩ FINAL1 ; ! _kaˊǧǧiǩ_
+Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>i FINAL1 ; ! _kaaggi_
+Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%>im FINAL1 ; ! _kaaggim_
+Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%>in FINAL1 ; ! _kaaggin_ is this sub?
+Pl2:%^VOWL%^CShort%>id FINAL1 ; ! _kaaggid_
+Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^PAL%>e FINAL1 ; ! _viˊǯǯe_ _kuõˊsǩǩe_ _ka'ǧǧe_
+4:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^PAL%>eš FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VIQQAD-Imp
+Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort FINAL1 ; ! _kaagg_
+Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>as FINAL1 ;
+Pl1:%>âp FINAL1 ;
+Pl2:%>âd FINAL1 ;
+Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%>az FINAL1 ;
+ConNeg:%^VOWSH%^CLong%>u FINAL1 ;
! Present tense
! - - - - - - - -

! assuming stem _teevv_
LEXICON TEEVVAD-PRS
 +Sg1:%^VOWL%^CShort%>am		FINAL1	; !WG !_teevam_ _lääulam_
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ak			FINAL1	; !WG _teevak_ _lääulak_
 +Sg3:			FINAL1	; !_teevv_ _läull_
 +Pl1:%>ap			FINAL1	; !_teevvap_ _läullap_
 +Pl2:%>veˊted		FINAL1	; !_teevvve'ted_ _läullve'ted_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%>a		FINAL1	; !_tevva_ _läulla_
 +4:%^VOWL%^CShort%>at FINAL1  ; !WG

! assuming stem _kâlmm_
LEXICON KALMMED-PRS
 +Sg1:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>am		FINAL1	; !WG _kâlmam_ 
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>ak		FINAL1	; !WG ! _kâlmak_
 +Sg3: FINAL1	; ! _kâlmm_
 +Pl1:%^VOWFront%^PAL%>ep		FINAL1	; ! _äˊlǧǧep_ _tieˊttep_
 +Pl2:%^VOWFront%^PAL%>veˊted		FINAL1	; ! _tieˊttveˊted_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e		FINAL1	; ! _teäˊtte_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%^VOWFront%^PAL%>e		FINAL1	; ! _teäˊtte_
 +4:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL%>et FINAL1 ; ! vueˊljet
 +ConNeg:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL FINAL1 ;

! assuming stem _jurdd_
LEXICON JURDDED-PRS
 +Sg1:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>am		FINAL1	; !WG _joordam_ 
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>ak		FINAL1	; !WG ! _joordak_
 +Sg3:%^VOWLower FINAL1	; ! _jordd_
 +Pl1:%^PAL%>ep		FINAL1	; ! _äˊlǧǧep_ _tieˊttep_
 +Pl2:%^PAL%>veˊted		FINAL1	; ! _tieˊttveˊted_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e		FINAL1	; ! _joˊrdde_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%^VOWFront%^PAL%>e		FINAL1	; ! _teäˊtte_
 +4:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>et FINAL1 ; ! juˊrddet
 +ConNeg:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL FINAL1 ;

! assuming stem _tieˊtt_
LEXICON TIETTED-PRS
 +Sg1:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>am		FINAL1	; !WG _teâđam_ 
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>ak		FINAL1	; !WG ! _teâđak_
 +Sg3:%^VOWLower FINAL1	; ! _teâtt_
 +Pl1:%^VOWFront%^PAL%>ep		FINAL1	; ! _äˊlǧǧep_ _tieˊttep_
 +Pl2:%^VOWFront%^PAL%>veˊted		FINAL1	; ! _tieˊttveˊted_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e		FINAL1	; ! _teäˊtte_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWLower%^VOWFront%^PAL%>e		FINAL1	; ! _teäˊtte_
 +4:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL%>et FINAL1 ; ! vueˊljet
 +ConNeg:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL FINAL1 ;

! assuming stem _ääˊv_ _teeˊm_
LEXICON TEEMEED-PRS
 +Sg1:%>ääm		FINAL1	; !WG _ääˊvääm_ 
 +Sg2:%>ääk		FINAL1	; !WG ! _ääˊvääk_
 +Sg3:%>ad FINAL1	; ! _ääˊvad_
 +Pl1:%>eep		FINAL1	; ! _ääˊveep_ _tieˊttep_
 +Pl2:%>veˊted		FINAL1	; ! _ääˊvveˊted_
 +Pl3:%>ee		FINAL1	; ! _ääˊvee_
 +4:%>eet FINAL1 ; ! ääˊveet
 +ConNeg:%>ed FINAL1 ; ! ääˊved

LEXICON MAINSTED-PRS
 +Sg1:%>am              FINAL1  ; !WG __
 +Sg2:%>ak              FINAL1  ; !WG ! __
 +Sg3:%^INDPRSSG3 FINAL1        ; ! __
 +Pl1:%>ep      FINAL1  ; ! __
 +Pl2:%>eˊped           FINAL1  ; ! __
 +Pl3:%>e               FINAL1  ; ! __
 +4:%>et FINAL1 ; !
 +ConNeg:%^IMPSG2 FINAL1 ; ! kååˊmmerd

! assuming stem _kåˊmQE1rded_
LEXICON KAMRDED-PRS
 +Sg1:%>am		FINAL1	; !WG __ 
 +Sg2:%>ak		FINAL1	; !WG ! __
 +Sg3:%^INDPRSSG3 FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl1:%>ep	FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl2:%>eˊped		FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl3:%>e		FINAL1	; ! __
 +4:%>et FINAL1 ; ! 
 +ConNeg:%^IMPSG2 FINAL1 ; ! kååˊmmerd
